Tennessee, session 114, SB2508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of health shall use existing resources to conduct a
study of the use of designated caregivers for admitted patients in hospitals in neighboring
states. The purpose of the study is to determine the prevalence of and identify the best
practices for the use of designated caregivers. As used in this act, "caregiver" means any
individual duly designated as a caregiver by a patient who provides after-care assistance to a
patient living in the patient's residence, and includes, but is not limited to, a relative, partner,
friend, or neighbor who has a significant relationship with the patient. The commissioner shall
compile the findings of the study and any legislative recommendations into a report, and submit
the report to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the
legislative librarian no later than December 31, 2026. The report may be published and
transmitted by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2508
012593
- 1 -